src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
turhaa:turhaa a_31_aa ;
hyvä: HYVA ; ! paras on täällä
ikivanhaa:iki#vanh VANHAA ;
vanhaa:vanh VANHAA ; ! formerly vanha_a_23, wrong
paha a_11_AO ;
lauha a_11_AO ;
laaja a_11_AO ;
taaja a_11_AO ;
hurja a_11_A0_A2I ;
luja a_11_A0_A2I ;
raaka a_11_AO ;
liika a_11_AO ;
tarkka a_11_AO ;
soukka a_11_A0_A2I ;
arka a_11_AO ;
laiska a_11_AO ;
siila a_11_AO ;
sula a_11_A0_A2I ;
lama a_11_AO ;
kumma a_11_A0_A2I ;
oma vanha_nocomp_a_21 ; ! TODO how does this work?
ikioma:iki#oma vanha_nocomp_a_21 ;
vaana:vaana a_11_AO ;
ruma a_11_A0_A2I ;
kuuma a_11_A0_A2I ;
julma:julma a_11_A0_A2I ;
halpa a_11_AO ;
epäsuora:epä#suora a_11_A0_A2I ;
pystösuora a_11_A0_A2I ;
latuska:latuska a_21_odd_AO ;
fasta a_11_AO ;
musta a_11_A0_A2I ;
kiva a_11_AO ;
loiva a_11_A0_A2I ;
kivikova:kivi#kova a_11_A0_A2I ;
säänkova:sään#kova a_11_A0_A2I ;
ehta:ehta a_11_A0_A2I ;
fakki a_11_i;
plankki a_11_i ;
flinkki a_11_i ;
nätti:nätti a_11_i ;
villi a_11_i ;
epähööli:epä#hööli a_11_i ;
hööli a_11_i ;
falski:falski a_11_i ;
pleeki:pleek2i a_11_i ;
viimi IRTI ;
kleini a_11_i ;
aurinkopruuni:aurinko#pruuni a_11_i ;
tummanpruuni:tumman#pruuni a_11_i ;
umpi:umpe a_11_E2I ;
klaari a_11_i ;
eri IRTI ;
ensi IRTI ;
epävissi a_11_i ;
vaiti VAITI ;
irti IRTI ;
pälvi:pälve a_11_E2I ;
krouvi a_11_i ;
ujo a_11 ;
kaalo a_11 ;
kehno a_11 ;
kuuro a_11 ;
vaisto a_11 ;
kaltto a_11 ;
siivo a_11 ;
ohu a_x ; !!! TODO aiemmin a_11, ei toimi.
kalju a_11 ;
pikku IRTI ;
lamu a_11 ;
paksu a_11 ;
ittetehty:itte#tehty a_11 ;
vino:vino a_11 ;
lyhy a_x ; !!! TODO aiemmin a_11 mutta se ei käy.
ylikypsy:yli#kypsy a_11 ;
puolityyhä:puoli#tyyhä a_11_ae ;
tyyhä a_11_ae ;
ravintoköyhä:ravinto#köyhä a_11_ae ;
löyhä a_11_ae ;
väljä a_11_ae ;
synkkä a_11_ae ;
mykkä a_11_ae ;
pitkä a_11_ae ;
sanaseppä:sana#seppä a_11_ae ;
väärä a_11_ae ;
löysä a_11_ae ;
sievä a_11_ae ;
päivänselvä:päivän#selvä a_11_ae ;
jyrkkä a_11_ae ;
koutu a_11 ;
sisä a_11_ae ;
säänpurema:sään#purema a_21_odd ;
ratikaali a_21 ;
meediumi:meediumi a_21 ;
fleksiibeli:fleksiibeli a_21 ;
fioletti a_21 ;
homofiili:homofiili a_21 ;
aktuelli:aktuelli a_21 ;
kriminelli:kriminelli a_21 ;
interkomunaali:inter#komunaali a_21 ;
nasunaali+Err/Orth:nasjunaali a_21 ;
populääri:populääri a_21 ;
elegantti:elegantti a_21 ;
kulttuurikompetentti+Err/Orth:kylttyyri#kompetentti a_21 ;
konsekventti:konsekventti a_21 ;
ultrafioletti a_21 ;
negatiivi a_21 ;
assimileeraava:assimileeraava a_21_A0 ;
epäluotettava:epä#luotettava a_21_A0 ;
ilmoittaava:ilmoittaava a_21_A0 ;
muistuttaava:muistuttaava a_21_A0 ;
ođottaava+Err/Orth:oottava a_21_A0 ;
paranttaava:paranttaava a_21_A0 ;
sovinttaava:sovinttaava a_21_A0 ;
kammottaava:kammottaava a_21_A0 ;
kansanvalittema:kansan#valittema a_21_A0 ;
mainittema:mainittema a_21_A0 ;
yksinhallitteeva:yksin#hallitteeva a_21_A0 ;
suojeleeva:suojeleeva a_21_A0 ;
huolestuttaava:huolestuttaava a_21_odd ;
kunnioittaava:kunnioittaava a_21_odd ;
provoseeraava:provoseeraava a_21_odd ;
vaihtuuva+Err/Orth:vaihtuva a_21_odd ;
katala a_21_odd ;
toimenankara:toimen#ankara a_21_odd ;
jannoova:jannoova a_21_odd ;
puhhuuva:puhhuuva a_21_odd ;
fasineeraava:fasineeraava a_21_odd ;
loistaava a_21_odd ;
mukava a_21_odd ;
rakastaava:rakastaava a_21_A0 ;
toivottava:toivottava a_21_A0 ;
herrattava+Err/Orth:herrattaava a_21_A0 ;
vasthaantulleeva:vasthaan#tulleeva a_21_odd ;
tummuuva+Err/Orth:tummuva a_21_odd ;
merkittävä a_21_ae_even ;
soppeeva:soppeeva a_21_odd ;
epämielyttäävä:epä#mielyttäävä a_21_ae_even ;
imettäävä:imettäävä a_21_ae_even ;
lissäänttyyvä:lissäänttyyvä a_21_ae_even ;
mielyttäävä:mielyttäävä a_21_ae_even ;
pyöryttäävä:pyöryttäävä a_21_ae_even ;
rajanylittäävä:rajan#ylittäävä a_21_ae_even ;
syventtäävä:syventtäävä a_21_ae_even ;
syventtäävä+Err/Orth:syventävä a_21_ae_even ;
virkistäävä:virkistäävä a_21_ae_even ;
ärryttäävä:ärryttäävä a_21_ae_even ;
jännittäävä:jännittäävä a_21_ae_even ;
pölättäävä:pölättäävä a_21_ae_even ;
siirettävä:siirettävä a_21_ae_even ;
vähättäävä:vähättäävä a_21_ae_even ;
tyly:tyly a_11 ;
ehyt a_x ; ! :eh
ohut a_x ; ! :oh
lyhyt a_x ; ! :lyh
vapaa:vap2 VAPAA ; !
vapaa+Err/Orth:vapa VAPAA ;
valinanvapaa:valinan#vap2 VAPAA ;
